District of Columbia statutes.
31-5607.08

Provisions applicable to administrative proceedings.

(a)

All actions of the Commissioner, including administrative proceedings, adoption of rules, and issuance of orders shall be governed by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2; provided, that:

(1)

The issuance of a stop order under § 31-5603.03(e) shall be governed by § 31-5603.03(e); and

(2)

The issuance of a summary order under § 31-5606.02(a) shall be governed by § 31-5606.02(a).

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 708, 47 DCR 7837